District of Columbia statutes.
22-2303

Permitted activity.

Acts authorized as an exercise of a person’s constitutional right to picket, protest, or speak, and acts authorized by a permit issued by the District of Columbia government shall not constitute unlawful activity under this chapter.

History

Nov. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 10-54, § 4, 40 DCR 5450

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-3313.